Vermont, session 2025-2026, H297.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
VT LEG #379260 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.297
2025 Page 2 of 7
(1) According to the New England Secondary School Consortium,
Vermont’s high school graduates continue on to college at the lowest rates in
New England at 45 percent, with students with low income, Black students,
students with disabilities, and male students facing the deepest equity gaps in
continuation rates.
(2) Rapidly declining college aspirations among youth since 2020, as
revealed by survey data from the Vermont Student Assistance Corporation
(VSAC), signal that continuation rates will sink lower.
(3) College degrees, especially associate’s degrees, have enduring value.
Associate’s degree graduates in Vermont are the most likely in the country to
achieve a positive return on investment at 79 percent, according to Strada
Education Foundation.
(4) Free accelerated associate’s degree pathways are a high-leverage
opportunity to improve Vermont’s college continuation rates among students
furthest from opportunity.
(5) Vermont’s enabling conditions to improve college attainment
through accelerated associate’s degree pathways are strong due to the
following factors:
(A) Vermont has a single, statewide community college. The
Community College of Vermont (CCV) serves the greatest number of
Vermonters and of Vermonters with low income of any college in the State via
VT LEG #379260 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.297
2025 Page 3 of 7
12 locations and extensive learning options. Over 25 percent of CCV students
are high school students.
(B) With the enactment of 2013 Acts and Resolves No. 77,
Vermont’s flexible pathways bill, Vermont has a 10-plus year history of
offering flexible pathways to graduation that include a free year of full-time
college in lieu of a traditional 12th grade year. Historically, most participating
students enroll at CCV.
(i) Act 77 was established to develop and expand high-quality
secondary education experiences, to promote opportunities for postsecondary
readiness, and to increase high school completion and postsecondary
continuation. Act 77 offers Vermont students two free dual enrollment courses
plus the opportunity to enroll in Early College their senior year.
(ii) Early College in Vermont allows seniors to complete their last
year of high school and their first year of college at the same time, earning free
college credits that also count toward graduation from high school.
(C) Vermont has established cross-sector partnerships. The cross-
sector Early College Equity Working Group has spent several years analyzing
data, building a shared vision, exploring promising practices, and addressing
barriers. In 2004, a cross-sector team from Vermont was invited to participate
in the national Accelerate ED community to build on this work.
VT LEG #379260 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.297
2025 Page 4 of 7
(D) Recent public investments in college affordability. Facing a
shrinking workforce and an economy with two job openings for every
jobseeker, policymakers have committed to investing in talent, particularly
through CCV and with the 802 Opportunity Grant.
(E) Since 2022, the McClure Foundation’s Free Degree Promise has
built on Vermont’s Early College program at CCV to create a free, fast-tracked
associate’s degree pathway available to all Vermont youth in the high school
classes of 2023–2026.
(F) Two and a half years since its launch, emerging data shows the
Free Degree Promise is working to equitably scale accelerated degrees for
Vermont youth. Since the Promise was announced in spring 2022, CCV has
seen a 150 percent increase in enrollment of students with low income in the
State’s Early College program at CCV and triple the number of CCV’s Early
College program completers persisting near-full-time at CCV toward a degree.
Over half of the 2024–2025 Free Degree Promise student cohort are first-
generation college students.
(G) CCV majors closely align with Vermont’s identified workforce
needs.
VT LEG #379260 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.297
2025 Page 5 of 7
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 2189 is added to read:
§ 2189. FREE DEGREE PROMISE GRANT PROGRAM
(a) Program creation. There is created the Free Degree Promise Grant
Program to provide funding toward a free associate’s degree through the
Community College of Vermont (CCV) for eligible individuals.
(b) Eligibility. CCV shall be responsible for verifying Program eligibility.
To be eligible for the Program, an individual shall satisfy each of the following
requirements:
(1) be enrolled at CCV on a full-time basis, which shall be a minimum
of 12 credits, in an approved undergraduate program of study leading to an
associate’s degree;
(2) have successfully completed the State’s Early College program,
established under section 946 of this title, at CCV, with a minimum of 20
successful credits in the academic year prior to receipt of the individual’s first
award under this Program;
(3) have not earned a prior associate’s degree or the equivalent;
(4) have completed the Free Application for Federal Student Aid or an
equivalent application for State-funded assistance;
(5) is not in default on any federal or state student loans for attendance
at any institution, or owe a refund for any previous state financial aid program;
and
VT LEG #379260 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.297
2025 Page 6 of 7
(6) meet satisfactory academic progress according to CCV’s
requirements.
(c) Program benefit.
(1) Free Degree Promise grants shall cover, after all other sources of
federal and State grant aid have been exhausted:
(A) any remaining tuition and fees due to CCV; and
(B) a stipend, per enrolled semester, for the cost of books, supplies,
and other expenses in the amount of:
(i) $1,000.00 for students whose household income is less than
400 percent of the federal poverty level per year; or
(ii) $500.00 for students whose household income is equal to or
greater than 400 percent of the federal poverty level per year.
(2) Eligible individuals may be awarded Free Degree Promise grants
and supports for a maximum of five semesters of full-time study, which shall
be a minimum of 12 enrolled credits per academic term, or until the individual
completes a degree program, whichever comes first.
(d) Disbursement of funds. CCV shall determine an individual’s eligibility
for the Program at the time of enrollment. Program funds shall be disbursed to
eligible individuals in the academic year in which funds are appropriated by
the General Assembly until funds are exhausted. Any funds remaining at the
VT LEG #379260 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.297
2025 Page 7 of 7
end of a fiscal year shall carry forward and shall be available to CCV in the
following fiscal year to award Program funds as set forth in this section.
(e) Administration, promotion, and evaluation. CCV shall adopt policies,
procedures, and guidelines necessary for implementation of the Program. Not
more than 12 percent of funds appropriated by the General Assembly for the
Program shall be used by CCV for student support services and the
administration and evaluation of the Program.
(f) Report. Annually on or before January 15, CCV shall report to the
General Assembly regarding implementation and administration of the
Program, including data regarding annual student enrollment in the Program,
dollar amounts spent and unspent, semester and degree completion
disaggregated by priority equity populations, and any recommendations for
legislative action regarding the Program. The provisions of 2 V.S.A. § 20(d)
(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the required report to be
made under this subsection.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379260 v.2